Wisconsin, session 2025, AB869.
do enact as follows:AB869,14Section 1. 196.374 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB869,2,61196.374 (1) (d) “Energy efficiency program” means a program for reducing the 2usage or increasing the efficiency of the usage of energy by a customer or member of 3an energy utility, municipal utility, or retail electric cooperative, including a 4program that promotes the development or use of energy storage systems by 5residential customers. “Energy efficiency program” does not include load 6management.AB869,27Section 2. 196.374 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB869,2,108196.374 (1) (dm) “Energy storage system” means a commercially available 9technology that uses mechanical, chemical, or thermal processes for absorbing 10energy and storing it for a period of time for use at a later time.AB869,311Section 3. 196.374 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB869,2,1712196.374 (3) (b) 2. The commission shall require each energy utility to spend 131.2 2.4 percent of its annual operating revenues derived from retail sales to fund the 14utility’s programs under sub. (2) (b) 1., the utility’s ordered programs, the utility’s 15share of the statewide energy efficiency and renewable resource programs under 16sub. (2) (a) 1., and the utility’s share, as determined by the commission under subd. 174., of the costs incurred by the commission in administering this section.AB869,2,1818